New York, session 2025-2026, S7899.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1901 of the public authorities law is amended by 2 adding two new subdivisions 10 and 11 to read as follows: 3 10. "Agrivoltaics" shall mean the simultaneous use of areas of land 4 for both solar power generation and agriculture through a ground-mounted 5 photovoltaic solar energy system constructed, installed, and operated to 6 achieve integrated and simultaneous production of both solar energy and 7 marketable agricultural products and activities by an agricultural 8 producer, provided that such use: 9 (a) is constructed, installed, and operated to achieve integrated and 10 simultaneous production of both solar energy and marketable agricultural 11 products consistent with commercial agricultural production, as soon as 12 agronomically feasible and continuing until decommissioning, on land 13 beneath or between rows of solar panels; 14 (b) has been intentionally planned and designed with agricultural 15 producers or experts; 16 (c) has provisions for decommissioning to protect the land's agricul- 17 tural resources and utility; and 18 (d) does not significantly displace farming activity. 19 11. "Agricultural products and activities" shall include: (a) crop 20 production; (b) animal husbandry; and (c) livestock grazing or cattle 21 grazing; provided, however, that agricultural products and activities 22 shall not include sheep grazing as the sole farming activity except EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11834-03-5 S. 7899--A 2 1 where the land utilized is currently utilized exclusively for such 2 purpose; and provided further, however, that agricultural products and 3 activities shall not include pollinator habitats, apiaries, or both as 4 the sole farming activities. 5 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 1902 of the public 6 authorities law, as amended by section 2 of part M of chapter 58 of the 7 laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 8 (b) (i) In making such assessment the authority shall give priority to 9 previously developed sites, existing or abandoned commercial sites, 10 including without limitation brownfields, landfills, former commercial 11 or industrial sites, dormant electric generating sites, parking lots as 12 defined in section one hundred twenty-nine-b of the vehicle and traffic 13 law, warehouse distribution centers as defined in section seven hundred 14 eighty of the labor law, correctional facilities as defined in article 15 one of the corrections law, retail establishments of greater than twen- 16 ty-five thousand square feet, roadside rest areas pursuant to section 17 twenty of the highway law, or otherwise underutilized sites; and 18 (ii) the authority may establish a renewable energy generation project 19 in furtherance of an [agrivolatic] agrivoltaics project, [where "agri- 20 voltaic project" shall mean the simultaneous use of areas of land for 21 both solar power generation and agriculture, specific to the practice of 22 such dual-use solar energy project,] where any of the previously devel- 23 oped sites listed in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph is reclaimed as 24 farmland. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 26 the amendments to section 1901 of the public authorities law made by 27 section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and 28 shall be deemed repealed therewith; and provided further, however, that 29 the amendments to paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 1902 of the 30 public authorities law made by section two of this act shall not affect 31 the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.